Wyoming, session 2025, HB0218.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-2-130 and 37-2-214 are amended to
read:

37-2-130. Right of review; stay of proceedings.

HB0218

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0394
(a) Subject to subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, a person adversely affected or aggrieved by any
action, findings, conclusions or decision of the public
service commission is entitled to judicial review thereof
according to the procedures established by the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act and the Wyoming Rules of
Appellate Procedure. The standards to be applied, to
judicial review proceedings, including scope of review,
shall be those standards established in the Wyoming
Administrative Procedure Act.

(b) If a public utility files a lawsuit that
challenges or seeks judicial review under this section by
challenging the constitutionality or legality of a
provision of this act or of a rule, regulation or procedure
of the commission, or that raises an argument under W.S.
16-3-114(c)(ii)(A) through (D), the commission shall stay
each request, application, rate case and any other matter
that requires application or consideration of the
challenged statute, rule, regulation or procedure until the
lawsuit or judicial review is fully resolved and closed.
This subsection shall apply to all requests, applications,
rate cases and other matters before the commission impacted
HB0218

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0394
by the challenged statute, rule, regulation or procedure or
that requires the application of the challenged statute,
rule, regulation or procedure, regardless of the party
involved in the request, application, rate case or matter.

(c) Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply
to:

(i) Any lawsuit or judicial review based on the
commission's application of facts or evidence or resolution
of disputed facts or evidence or based on an argument
raised under W.S. 16-3-114(c)(ii)(E);

(ii) Any action that the commission begins and
prosecutes for violations under W.S. 37-2-215.

37-2-214. Rehearing.

Subject to W.S. 37-2-130(b) and (c), at any time after
an order has been made by the commission any person
interested therein may apply for a rehearing in respect to
any matter determined therein and the commission shall
grant and hold a rehearing if in its judgment sufficient
HB0218

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0394
reason therefor be made to appear, which rehearing shall be
subject to rules as the commission may prescribe.
Applications for rehearing shall stay the effect of any
order or decision of the commission only as to the portion
of the order addressed in the rehearing application until
the commission denies the application or enters an order
following rehearing, whichever last occurs, provided,
however, that upon the request of any party and a showing
of good cause therefor, the commission may vacate the stay
and allow the order or decision to remain in effect. An
order or decision made after the rehearing vacating,
amending or modifying the original order or decision shall
not, as to the matter considered on rehearing, be open to a
further application for rehearing, and shall have the same
force and effect as the original order or decision.

Section 2. This act shall apply to all requests,
applications, rate cases and other matters filed with the
public service commission for which litigation specified in
this act has been filed before, on and after the effective
date of this act.

HB0218

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0394
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0218